Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-502.04
Policy loans; interest rate provisions; when applicable.

The provisions of sections 44-502.01 to 44-502.04 shall not apply to any insurance contract issued before August 30, 1981, unless the policyholder agrees in writing to the applicability of such provisions. Any such agreement shall be void unless it is entered into by the policyholder voluntarily and following full disclosure of its effects pursuant to the rules and regulations of the Department of Insurance.

Laws 1981, LB 355, § 17;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 121.